Hawaii, session 2026, SB256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The amounts available to candidates in Hawaiis partial public financing program was last amended in 1995.  The legislature finds that since 1995-1996, the value of the dollar has risen to approximately $2.06. The purpose of this Act is to increase the amount of funds available to candidates qualified to participate in the partial public financing program.  This Act increases the amount of funds available to candidates for the board of trustees for the office of Hawaiian affairs, who run statewide.  This Act increases matching fund payments from $1 for each $1 of qualifying contributions in excess of the minimum qualifying contribution amounts to $2 for each $1 of excess qualifying contributions.  To encourage participation in the partial public financing program, this Act provides for the downward adjustment of the amount of minimum qualifying contributions required for certain offices.  Finally, this Act appropriates funds from the general revenues of the State to increase the amount of funds available in the partial public financing program and to permit the campaign spending commission to hire more staff to address the anticipated increase in participation in the financing program. SECTION 2.  Section 11-425, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§11-425  Maximum amount of public funds available to candidate.  (a)  The maximum amount of public funds available in each election to a candidate for the office of governor, lieutenant governor, or mayor of the city and county of Honolulu or the county of Hawaii shall not exceed [ten] fifteen per cent of the expenditure limit established in section 11-423(d) for each election. (b)  The maximum amount of public funds available in each election to a candidate for the office of state senator, state representative, mayor of the county of Kauai or the county of Maui, county council member, and prosecuting attorney shall not exceed [fifteen] 22.5 per cent of the expenditure limit established in section 11-423(d) for each election. (c)  For the office of Hawaiian affairs, the maximum amount of public funds available to a candidate shall not exceed [$1,500 in any election year. (d)  For all other offices, the maximum amount of public funds available to a candidate shall not exceed $100 in any election year.] ten per cent of the expenditure limit established in section 11-423(d) for each election. [(e)] (d)  Each candidate who qualified for the maximum amount of public funding in any primary election and who is a candidate for a subsequent general election shall apply with the commission to be qualified to receive the maximum amount of public funds as provided in this section for the respective general election.  For purposes of this section, "qualified" means meeting the qualifying campaign contribution requirements of section 11-429." SECTION 3.  Section 11-429, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) and (b) to read as follows: "(a) As a condition of receiving public funds for a primary or general election, a candidate shall not be unopposed in any election for which public funds are sought, shall have filed an affidavit with the commission pursuant to section 11‑423 to voluntarily limit the candidate's campaign expenditures, and shall be in receipt of the following sum of qualifying contributions from individual residents of Hawaii: (1)  For the office of governor--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed $100,000; (2)  For the office of lieutenant governor--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed $50,000; (3)  For the office of mayor for each respective county: (A)  County of Honolulu--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed $50,000; (B)  County of Hawaii--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed $15,000; (C)  County of Maui--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed $10,000; and (D)  County of Kauai--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed $5,000; (4)  For the office of prosecuting attorney for each respective county: (A)  County of Honolulu--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed [$30,000;] $25,000; (B)  County of Hawaii--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed [$10,000;] $5,000; and (C)  County of Kauai--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed [$5,000;] $3,000; (5)  For the office of county council--for each respective county: (A)  County of Honolulu--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed $5,000; (B)  County of Hawaii--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed $1,500; (C)  County of Maui--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed [$5,000;] $4,000; and (D)  County of Kauai--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed $3,000; (6)  For the office of state senator--qualifying contributions that, in the aggregate exceed $2,500; (7)  For the office of state representative--qualifying contributions that, in the aggregate, exceed $1,500; (8)  For the office of Hawaiian affairs--qualifying contributions that, in the aggregate, exceed [$1,500;] $5,500; and (9)  For all other offices, qualifying contributions that, in the aggregate, exceed $500. (b)  A candidate shall obtain the minimum qualifying contribution amount set forth in subsection (a) once for the election period. (1)  If the candidate obtains the minimum qualifying contribution amount, the candidate is eligible to receive: (A)  The minimum payment in an amount equal to the minimum qualifying contribution amounts; and (B)  Payments of [$1] $2 for each $1 of qualifying contributions in excess of the minimum qualifying contribution amounts; and (2)  A candidate shall have at least one other qualified candidate as an opponent for the primary or general election to receive public funds for that election." SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 to be deposited into the Hawaii election campaign fund. SECTION 5.  There is appropriated out of the Hawaii election campaign fund the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purposes of this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the campaign spending commission for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $200,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for two full-time equivalent (2.0 FTE) permanent positions to be placed within the campaign spending commission. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the campaign spending commission for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 7. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 8. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 9. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________